Illinois, session 104th, SB3733.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-45.71 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.71 new)7    Sec. 5-45.71. Emergency rulemaking; Illinois Gaming Board. 8To provide for the expeditious and timely implementation of 9Sections 25-120 through 25-120.8 of the Sports Wagering Act, 10emergency rules implementing Sections 25-120 through 25-120.8 11of the Sports Wagering Act may be adopted in accordance with 12Section 5-45 by the Illinois Gaming Board. The adoption of 13emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is 14deemed to be necessary for the public interest, safety, and 15welfare.16    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 17of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 18    Section 10. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by changing 19Sections 25-10, 25-25, 25-45, and 25-100 and by adding 20Sections 25-120, 25-120.1, 25-120.2, 25-120.3, 25-120.4, 2125-120.5, 25-120.6, 25-120.7, and 25-120.8 as follows:   SB3733- 2 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    (230 ILCS 45/25-10)2    Sec. 25-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:3    "Adjusted gross sports wagering receipts" means a master 4sports wagering licensee's gross sports wagering receipts, 5less winnings paid to wagerers in such games.6    "Athlete" means any current or former professional athlete 7or collegiate athlete.8    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board.9    "Covered persons" includes athletes; umpires, referees, 10and officials; personnel associated with clubs, teams, 11leagues, and athletic associations; medical professionals 12(including athletic trainers) who provide services to athletes 13and players; and the family members and associates of these 14persons where required to serve the purposes of this Act.15    "Department" means the Department of the Lottery.16    "Gaming facility" means a facility at which gambling 17operations are conducted under the Illinois Gambling Act, 18pari-mutuel wagering is conducted under the Illinois Horse 19Racing Act of 1975, or sports wagering is conducted under this 20Act.21    "Official league data" means statistics, results, 22outcomes, and other data related to a sports event obtained 23pursuant to an agreement with the relevant sports governing 24body, or an entity expressly authorized by the sports 25governing body to provide such information to licensees, that 26authorizes the use of such data for determining the outcome of   SB3733- 3 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1tier 2 sports wagers on such sports events.2    "Organization licensee" has the meaning given to that term 3in the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975.4    "Owners licensee" means the holder of an owners license 5under the Illinois Gambling Act.6    "Person" means an individual, partnership, committee, 7association, corporation, or any other organization or group 8of persons.9    "Personal biometric data" means an athlete's information 10derived from DNA, heart rate, blood pressure, perspiration 11rate, internal or external body temperature, hormone levels, 12glucose levels, hydration levels, vitamin levels, bone 13density, muscle density, and sleep patterns.14    "Prohibited conduct" includes any statement, action, and 15other communication intended to influence, manipulate, or 16control a betting outcome of a sporting contest or of any 17individual occurrence or performance in a sporting contest in 18exchange for financial gain or to avoid financial or physical 19harm. "Prohibited conduct" includes statements, actions, and 20communications made to a covered person by a third party, such 21as a family member or through social media. "Prohibited 22conduct" does not include statements, actions, or 23communications made or sanctioned by a team or sports 24governing body.25    "Qualified applicant" means an applicant for a license 26under this Act whose application meets the mandatory minimum   SB3733- 4 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1qualification criteria as required by the Board.2    "Sporting contest" means a sports event or game on which 3the State allows sports wagering to occur under this Act. 4    "Sports event" means a professional sport or athletic 5event, a collegiate sport or athletic event, a motor race 6event, or any other event or competition of relative skill 7authorized by the Board under this Act.8    "Sports facility" means a facility that hosts sports 9events and holds a seating capacity greater than 17,000 10persons, except in a municipality with a population of more 11than 1,000,000, a seating capacity greater than 10,000 12persons.13    "Sports governing body" means the organization that 14prescribes final rules and enforces codes of conduct with 15respect to a sports event and participants therein. 16    "Sports wagering" means accepting wagers on sports events 17or portions of sports events, or on the individual performance 18statistics of athletes in a sports event or combination of 19sports events, by any system or method of wagering, including, 20but not limited to, in person or over the Internet through 21websites and on mobile devices. "Sports wagering" includes, 22but is not limited to, single-game bets, teaser bets, parlays, 23over-under, moneyline, pools, exchange wagering, in-game 24wagering, in-play bets, proposition bets, and straight bets. 25"Sports wagering" does not include fantasy contests as that 26term is defined in Section 25-120.1.   SB3733- 5 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    "Sports wagering account" means a financial record 2established by a master sports wagering licensee for an 3individual patron in which the patron may deposit and withdraw 4funds for sports wagering and other authorized purchases and 5to which the master sports wagering licensee may credit 6winnings or other amounts due to that patron or authorized by 7that patron.8    "Tier 1 sports wager" means a sports wager that is 9determined solely by the final score or final outcome of the 10sports event and is placed before the sports event has begun. 11    "Tier 2 sports wager" means a sports wager that is not a 12tier 1 sports wager.13    "Wager" means a sum of money or thing of value risked on an 14uncertain occurrence.15    "Winning bidder" means a qualified applicant for a master 16sports wagering license chosen through the competitive 17selection process under Section 25-45.18(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.) 19    (230 ILCS 45/25-25)20    Sec. 25-25. Sports wagering authorized.21    (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 22the operation of sports wagering is only lawful when conducted 23in accordance with the provisions of this Act and the rules of 24the Illinois Gaming Board and the Department of the Lottery.25    (b) A person placing a wager under this Act shall be at   SB3733- 6 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1least 21 years of age.2    (c) A licensee under this Act may not accept a wager on a 3minor league sports event.4    (d) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a 5licensee under this Act may not accept a wager for a sports 6event involving an Illinois collegiate team.7    (d-5) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 8Act of the 102nd General Assembly until July 1, 2024, a 9licensee under this Act may accept a wager for a sports event 10involving an Illinois collegiate team if:11        (1) the wager is a tier 1 wager;12        (2) the wager is not related to an individual 13    athlete's performance; and14        (3) the wager is made in person instead of over the 15    Internet or through a mobile application. 16    (e) A licensee under this Act may only accept a wager from 17a person physically located in the State.18    (f) Master sports wagering licensees may use any data 19source for determining the results of all tier 1 sports 20wagers.21    (g) A sports governing body headquartered in the United 22States may notify the Board that it desires to supply official 23league data to master sports wagering licensees for 24determining the results of tier 2 sports wagers. Such 25notification shall be made in the form and manner as the Board 26may require. If a sports governing body does not notify the   SB3733- 7 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1Board of its desire to supply official league data, a master 2sports wagering licensee may use any data source for 3determining the results of any and all tier 2 sports wagers on 4sports contests for that sports governing body.5    Within 30 days of a sports governing body notifying the 6Board, master sports wagering licensees shall use only 7official league data to determine the results of tier 2 sports 8wagers on sports events sanctioned by that sports governing 9body, unless: (1) the sports governing body or designee cannot 10provide a feed of official league data to determine the 11results of a particular type of tier 2 sports wager, in which 12case master sports wagering licensees may use any data source 13for determining the results of the applicable tier 2 sports 14wager until such time as such data feed becomes available on 15commercially reasonable terms; or (2) a master sports wagering 16licensee can demonstrate to the Board that the sports 17governing body or its designee cannot provide a feed of 18official league data to the master sports wagering licensee on 19commercially reasonable terms. During the pendency of the 20Board's determination, such master sports wagering licensee 21may use any data source for determining the results of any and 22all tier 2 sports wagers. 23    (h) A licensee under this Act may not accept wagers on a 24kindergarten through 12th grade sports event.25    (i) A licensee may offer pool sports wagering to State 26patrons where State patrons compete against patrons located   SB3733- 8 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1outside of the State. In such cases, the pool must be expressly 2permitted in all jurisdictions in which it is offered and must 3comply with all laws, rules, and regulations in all 4jurisdictions in which it is offered. The adjusted gross 5sports wagering receipts of an interstate pool shall be 6determined by the total value of all wagers placed in the State 7less the proportional pro rata value of all winnings paid to 8patrons. The pro rata value of all winnings shall be 9determined by the ratio of the total value of all wagers placed 10in the State divided by the total value of all wagers placed in 11the pool, to the nearest .01%. 12(Source: P.A. 102-689, eff. 12-17-21; 103-4, eff. 5-31-23.) 13    (230 ILCS 45/25-45)14    Sec. 25-45. Master sports wagering license issued to an 15online sports wagering operator.16    (a) The Board may issue master sports wagering licenses to 17persons to conduct sports wagering over the Internet or 18through a mobile application. The Board shall issue 3 master 19sports wagering licenses to online sports wagering operators 20for a nonrefundable license fee of $20,000,000 pursuant to an 21open and competitive selection process. The master sports 22wagering license issued under this Section may be renewed 23every 4 years upon payment of a $1,000,000 renewal fee. To the 24extent permitted by federal and State law, the Board shall 25actively seek to achieve racial, ethnic, and geographic   SB3733- 9 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1diversity when issuing master sports wagering licenses under 2this Section and encourage minority-owned businesses, 3women-owned businesses, veteran-owned businesses, and 4businesses owned by persons with disabilities to apply for 5licensure.6    For the purposes of this subsection (a), "minority-owned 7business", "women-owned business", and "business owned by 8persons with disabilities" have the meanings given to those 9terms in Section 2 of the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 10Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act.11    (b) Applicants shall pay to the Board a nonrefundable 12application fee in the amount of $250,000. The initial license 13fee for a master sports wagering license issued to an online 14sports wagering operator is $15,000,000. The master sports 15wagering license is valid for 4 years. Applications for the 16initial competitive selection occurring after the effective 17date of this Act shall be received by the Board within 540 days 18after the first license is issued under this Act to qualify. 19The Board shall announce the winning bidders for the initial 20competitive selection within 630 days after the first license 21is issued under this Act, and this time frame may be extended 22at the discretion of the Board.23    (c) A licensee may renew the master sports wagering 24license for a period of 4 years by paying a $1,000,000 renewal 25fee to the Board. The Board shall provide public notice of its 26intent to solicit applications for master sports wagering   SB3733- 10 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1licenses under this Section by posting the notice, application 2instructions, and materials on its website for at least 30 3calendar days before the applications are due. Failure by an 4applicant to submit all required information may result in the 5application being disqualified. The Board may notify an 6applicant that its application is incomplete and provide an 7opportunity to cure by rule. Application instructions shall 8include a brief overview of the selection process and how 9applications are scored.10    (d) A master sports wagering licensee may conduct sports 11wagering over the Internet or through a mobile application. To 12be eligible for a master sports wagering license under this 13Section, an applicant must: (1) be at least 21 years of age; 14(2) not have been convicted of a felony offense or a violation 15of Article 28 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 16of 2012 or a similar statute of any other jurisdiction; (3) not 17have been convicted of a crime involving dishonesty or moral 18turpitude; (4) have demonstrated a level of skill or knowledge 19that the Board determines to be necessary in order to operate 20sports wagering; and (5) have met standards for the holding of 21a license as adopted by rules of the Board.22    The Board may adopt rules to establish additional 23qualifications and requirements to preserve the integrity and 24security of sports wagering in this State and to promote and 25maintain a competitive sports wagering market. After the close 26of the application period, the Board shall determine whether   SB3733- 11 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1the applications meet the mandatory minimum qualification 2criteria and conduct a comprehensive, fair, and impartial 3evaluation of all qualified applications.4    (e) (Blank). The Board shall open all qualified 5applications in a public forum and disclose the applicants' 6names. The Board shall summarize the terms of the proposals 7and make the summaries available to the public on its website.8    (f) (Blank). Not more than 90 days after the publication 9of the qualified applications, the Board shall identify the 10winning bidders. In granting the licenses, the Board may give 11favorable consideration to qualified applicants presenting 12plans that provide for economic development and community 13engagement. To the extent permitted by federal and State law, 14the Board may give favorable consideration to qualified 15applicants demonstrating commitment to diversity in the 16workplace.17    (g) (Blank). Upon selection of the winning bidders, the 18Board shall have a reasonable period of time to ensure 19compliance with all applicable statutory and regulatory 20criteria before issuing the licenses. If the Board determines 21a winning bidder does not satisfy all applicable statutory and 22regulatory criteria, the Board shall select another bidder 23from the remaining qualified applicants.24    (h) (Blank). Nothing in this Section is intended to confer 25a property or other right, duty, privilege, or interest 26entitling an applicant to an administrative hearing upon   SB3733- 12 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1denial of an application.2    (i) (Blank). Upon issuance of a master sports wagering 3license to a winning bidder, the information and plans 4provided in the application become a condition of the license. 5A master sports wagering licensee under this Section has a 6duty to disclose any material changes to the application. 7Failure to comply with the conditions or requirements in the 8application may subject the master sports wagering licensee 9under this Section to discipline, including, but not limited 10to, fines, suspension, and revocation of its license, pursuant 11to rules adopted by the Board.12    (j) (Blank). The Board shall disseminate information about 13the licensing process through media demonstrated to reach 14large numbers of business owners and entrepreneurs who are 15minorities, women, veterans, and persons with disabilities.16    (k) (Blank). The Department of Commerce and Economic 17Opportunity, in conjunction with the Board, shall conduct 18ongoing, thorough, and comprehensive outreach to businesses 19owned by minorities, women, veterans, and persons with 20disabilities about contracting and entrepreneurial 21opportunities in sports wagering. This outreach shall include, 22but not be limited to:23        (1) cooperating and collaborating with other State 24    boards, commissions, and agencies; public and private 25    universities and community colleges; and local governments 26    to target outreach efforts; and  SB3733- 13 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1        (2) working with organizations serving minorities, 2    women, and persons with disabilities to establish and 3    conduct training for employment in sports wagering.4    (l) (Blank). The Board shall partner with the Department 5of Labor, the Department of Financial and Professional 6Regulation, and the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity to identify employment opportunities within the 8sports wagering industry for job seekers and dislocated 9workers.10    (m) By March 1, 2020, the Board shall prepare a request for 11proposals to conduct a study of the online sports wagering 12industry and market to determine whether there is a compelling 13interest in implementing remedial measures, including the 14application of the Business Enterprise Program under the 15Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 16Disabilities Act or a similar program to assist minorities, 17women, and persons with disabilities in the sports wagering 18industry.19    As a part of the study, the Board shall evaluate race and 20gender-neutral programs or other methods that may be used to 21address the needs of minority and women applicants and 22minority-owned and women-owned businesses seeking to 23participate in the sports wagering industry. The Board shall 24submit to the General Assembly and publish on its website the 25results of this study by August 1, 2020.26    If, as a result of the study conducted under this   SB3733- 14 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1subsection (m), the Board finds that there is a compelling 2interest in implementing remedial measures, the Board may 3adopt rules, including emergency rules, to implement remedial 4measures, if necessary and to the extent permitted by State 5and federal law, based on the findings of the study conducted 6under this subsection (m).7(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 8    (230 ILCS 45/25-100)9    Sec. 25-100. Voluntary self-exclusion program for sports 10wagering and fantasy contests. Any resident, or non-resident 11if allowed to participate in sports wagering or fantasy 12contests, may voluntarily prohibit himself or herself from 13establishing a sports wagering account or fantasy contest 14account with a licensee under this Act. The Board and 15Department shall incorporate the voluntary self-exclusion 16program for sports wagering and fantasy contests into any 17existing self-exclusion program that it operates on the 18effective date of this Act.19(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 20    (230 ILCS 45/25-120 new)21    Sec. 25-120. Fantasy contests; legislative intent. Fantasy 22contests are legally distinct from sports wagering. 23Nonetheless, the State seeks to ensure both public confidence 24and trust in the credibility and integrity of fantasy   SB3733- 15 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1contests, as well as to protect the public health and general 2welfare of the people of the State. Therefore, regulatory 3provisions of this Act are designed to strictly regulate the 4facilities, persons, associations, and practices related to 5fantasy contest operations pursuant to the police powers of 6the State, including comprehensive law enforcement 7supervision. 8    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.1 new)9    Sec. 25-120.1. Definitions. As used in Sections 25-120 10through 25-120.8: 11    "Adjusted gross fantasy contest receipts" means the total 12gross entry fees collected from fantasy contest participants 13in the State, less the in-state participant pro rata share of 14the total cash prizes paid to any participants in those 15contests.16    "Entry fee" means a nonrefundable cash fee that is paid by 17or on behalf of a participant, or any other entry method 18obtained for monetary consideration by the participant and set 19in advance by a fantasy contest operator granting the 20participant the right to participate in a fantasy contest.21    "Fantasy contest" means an online contest of skill between 222 or more participants with an entry fee where:23        (1) the values of all prizes offered to a winning 24    participant are established and made known to the 25    participant in advance of the contest;  SB3733- 16 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1        (2) all winning outcomes reflect the relative 2    knowledge and skill of the participant;3        (3) the participant assembles, owns, or manages a 4    fictional entry or roster of actual professional or 5    amateur athletes, in real-world sports events, or other 6    event or competition of relative skill authorized by the 7    Board;8        (4) a participant competes for prizes awarded by a 9    fantasy contest operator based on terms and conditions 10    published by the fantasy contest operator and made known 11    to the participant in advance of the contest;12        (5) winning outcomes are determined solely by clearly 13    preestablished, objective scoring criteria based on one or 14    more statistical results of the performance of an 15    individual athlete, including, but not limited to, a 16    fantasy score; and17        (6) no winning outcome is entirely based on the score, 18    point spread, or any performance of any single actual team 19    or combination of teams or solely on any single 20    performance of an individual athlete or player in any 21    single actual event.22    "Fantasy contest" does not include pool sports wagering 23conducted in accordance with subsection (i) of Section 25-25 24of the Sports Wagering Act, single-participant contests played 25against a fantasy contest operator, or contests without an 26entry fee.  SB3733- 17 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    "Fantasy contest operator" means a person or entity that 2offers fantasy contests to members of the public. "Fantasy 3contest operator" does not include an Internet service 4provider or a provider of mobile data services merely as a 5result of that entity's transporting general traffic that may 6include a fantasy contest.7    "Large fantasy contest operator" means a fantasy contest 8operator that had more than 7,500 patrons over the preceding 9365-day period. 10    "Participant" means an individual who participates in a 11fantasy contest offered by a fantasy contest operator.12    "Small fantasy contest operator" means a fantasy contest 13operator that had 7,500 or fewer patrons over the preceding 14365-day period.  15    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.2 new)16    Sec. 25-120.2. Board powers. 17    (a) The Board may regulate the conduct of fantasy contest 18operators under this Act.19    (b) The Board shall adopt any rules the Board considers 20necessary for the successful implementation, administration, 21and enforcement of this Act. Rules proposed by the Board may be 22adopted as emergency rules under Section 5-45 of the Illinois 23Administrative Procedure Act.24    (c) The Board shall levy and collect all fees, surcharges, 25civil penalties, and, on adjusted gross fantasy contest   SB3733- 18 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1receipts imposed under this Act, monthly taxes as follows:2        (1) All application, licensing, and renewal fees 3    collected under this Act shall be deposited in the State 4    Gaming Fund.5        (2) All taxes collected under Section 25-120.6 shall 6    be deposited into the State Gaming Fund.7        (3) All civil penalties or fines levied under this 8    Section shall be deposited in accordance with the Illinois 9    Gambling Act.10    (d) The Board may exercise any other powers necessary to 11enforce the provisions of this Act that it regulates and the 12rules of the Board.13    (e) The Board and fantasy contest operator licensees may 14cooperate with investigations conducted by law enforcement 15agencies, including, but not limited to, providing and 16facilitating the provision of account-level entry and 17participation information. 18    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.3 new)19    Sec. 25-120.3. Licensure required. 20    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a person 21may not offer fantasy contests in this State unless the person 22is licensed by the Board as a fantasy contest operator. No 23party other than an owner or key person of a licensee may 24receive revenue share from the operation of fantasy contests 25without holding a fantasy contest operator license. A person   SB3733- 19 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1that knowingly offers fantasy contests in violation of this 2subsection is guilty of a Class 4 felony.3    (b) A fantasy contest operator that was offering contests 4to persons located in the State before the effective date of 5this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly may continue 6to offer contests to persons located in the State until 90 days 7after the effective date of rules implementing this amendatory 8Act of the 104th General Assembly. The Board shall issue a 9temporary operating permit to a fantasy contest operator that 10was offering contests to persons located in this State before 11the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 12Assembly if the fantasy contest operator files an application 13for licensure with the Board and pays the required license 14application fee within 90 days of the effective date of rules 15implementing this amendatory Act of the 104th General 16Assembly, subject to Board rules. A holder of a temporary 17operating permit may continue to offer fantasy sports contests 18until a final licensing decision is made by the Board.19    (c) The burden is upon each applicant to demonstrate the 20applicant's suitability for licensure. An applicant for a 21license issued under this Act shall submit an application to 22the Board in the form the Board requires. Each person seeking 23licensure shall submit to a background investigation conducted 24by the Board with the assistance of the Illinois State Police 25or other law enforcement.26        (1) To the extent that the corporate structure of the   SB3733- 20 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    applicant allows, the background investigation shall 2    include any or all of the following as the Board deems 3    appropriate or as provided by rule for each category of 4    licensure:5            (A) each beneficiary of a trust;6            (B) each partner of a partnership;7            (C) each member of a limited liability company;8            (D) each director and officer of a publicly or 9        nonpublicly held corporation;10            (E) each stockholder of a nonpublicly held 11        corporation;12            (F) each stockholder of 5% or more of a publicly 13        held corporation; or14            (G) each stockholder of 5% or more in a parent or 15        subsidiary corporation.16        (2) Each applicant shall disclose the identity of 17    every person, association, trust, corporation, or limited 18    liability company having a greater than 1% direct or 19    indirect pecuniary interest in the fantasy contest for 20    which the license is sought. If the disclosed entity is a 21    trust, the application shall disclose the names and 22    addresses of the beneficiaries; if a corporation, the 23    names and addresses of all stockholders and directors; if 24    a limited liability company, the names and addresses of 25    all members; or if a partnership, the names and addresses 26    of all partners, both general and limited.  SB3733- 21 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    (d) To be eligible for a fantasy contest operator license 2under this Section, an applicant and its key persons must at 3minimum:4        (1) be at least 21 years of age;5        (2) not have been convicted of a felony offense or a 6    violation of Article 28 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 7    Criminal Code of 2012 or a similar statute of any other 8    jurisdiction;9        (3) not have been convicted of a crime involving 10    dishonesty or moral turpitude;11        (4) have demonstrated a level of skill or knowledge 12    that the Board determines to be necessary in order to 13    operate fantasy contests; and14        (5) have met standards for the holding of a license as 15    adopted by rules of the Board.16    (e) No person may be licensed if that person has been found 17by the Board to:18        (1) have a background, including a criminal record, 19    reputation, habits, social or business associations, or 20    prior activities that pose a threat to the public 21    interests of the State or to the security and integrity of 22    fantasy contest operations;23        (2) create or enhance the dangers of unsuitable, 24    unfair, or illegal practices, methods, and activities in 25    the conduct of fantasy contest operations; or26        (3) present questionable business practices and   SB3733- 22 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    financial arrangements incidental to the conduct of 2    fantasy contest operations.3    (f) An applicant shall not be denied licensure on the 4basis of having previously offered or conducted single-player 5contests against the operator, so long as no such contests 6were offered by the applicant after the effective date of this 7amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.8    (g) On receipt of a completed application and the required 9fee, the Board shall conduct the necessary background 10investigation to determine if the applicant meets the 11qualifications for licensure. On completion of the necessary 12background investigation, the Board shall either issue a 13license or deny the application. The Board shall establish 14procedures to conduct hearings for any person denied 15licensure.16    (h) The Board has designated 2 categories of fantasy 17contest operator, a large fantasy contest operator and a small 18fantasy contest operator. A small fantasy contest operator 19shall pay an application and initial license fee of $500 at the 20time of application. A large fantasy contest operator shall 21pay an application and initial license fee of $7,500 at the 22time of application.23    (i) The term of an initial license shall be 2 years.24    (j) A large fantasy contest operator shall pay a fantasy 25contest operator license renewal fee of $5,000 within 30 days 26of the renewal of a license. A small fantasy contest operator   SB3733- 23 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1shall pay a fantasy contest operator license renewal fee of 2$300 within 30 days of the renewal of a license. The license 3shall be renewed every 2 years. 4    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.4 new)5    Sec. 25-120.4. Conduct of contests. 6    (a) Any fantasy contest conducted under this Act does not 7constitute gambling for any purpose, including under Article 828 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.9    (b) A person participating in a fantasy contest under this 10Act shall be at least 21 years of age.11    (c) A licensee under this Act may only accept an entry from 12a person physically located in the State. A fantasy contest 13operator must use a geolocation system to ensure that a 14participant is physically present in the State when 15participating in the fantasy contest unless otherwise 16authorized by the Board.17    (e) No athlete, competitor, referee, official, coach, 18manager, medical professional, or athletic trainer or employee 19or contractor of a team or athletic organization who has 20access to nonpublic information concerning an athlete or team 21may engage in fantasy contests involving an event or the 22performance of an individual in an event in which the person is 23participating or otherwise has access to nonpublic or 24exclusive information.25    (f) No key person or employee of a fantasy contest   SB3733- 24 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1operator licensee may participate in fantasy contests offered 2by licensee. 3    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.5 new)4    Sec. 25-120.5. Duties of licensees. 5    (a) Licensees shall comply with all applicable anti-money 6laundering standards.7    (b) Licensees have an affirmative duty to prevent underage 8participation in fantasy contents. Licensees shall establish 9technical and operational measures to prevent underage 10participation in a fantasy contest.11    (c) Licensees shall implement identity verification 12procedures, consistent with modern best practices, to verify 13an individual's personally identifiable information and can 14detect potential prohibited participants.15    (d) Licensees shall employ mechanisms on the operator's 16platform that are designed to detect and prevent unauthorized 17accounts and to detect and prevent fraud, money laundering, 18and collusion.19    (e) Licensees shall implement geolocation technology to 20verify that a participant is not accessing the platform from a 21restricted jurisdiction.22    (f) Licensees shall make all reasonable efforts to 23promptly notify the Board of any information relating to:24        (1) a confirmed breach of the relevant sport's 25    governing body's internal rules and codes of conduct   SB3733- 25 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    pertaining to participation in real-money fantasy 2    contests;3        (2) any conduct that corrupts any outcome related to a 4    sports event or sports events for purposes of financial 5    gain, including match fixing; and6        (3) suspected illegal activities, including use of 7    funds derived from illegal activity, entries to conceal or 8    launder funds derived from illegal activity, 9    multi-accounting, and using false identification. 10    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.6 new)11    Sec. 25-120.6. Audits and recordkeeping. 12    (a) Licensees shall contract with a certified public 13accountant to conduct an annual independent audit consistent 14with generally accepted accounting principles and any 15additional standards adopted by the Board.16    (b) A licensee's fantasy contest platform must be tested 17and certified by an independent outside testing laboratory 18approved by the Board prior to commencement of fantasy 19contests under this Act. The licensee shall have the fantasy 20contest platform re-tested and certified on an annual basis.21    (c) Each licensee shall maintain in a place, secure from 22theft, loss, or destruction, adequate records of business 23operations that shall be made available to the Board upon 24request. These records shall be held for at least as long as 25prescribed by the records retention schedule published by the   SB3733- 26 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1Board, or longer if otherwise prescribed by general accounting 2and auditing procedures, litigation needs, or State or federal 3law. These records shall be maintained in a manner accessible 4to the Board or in a digital format prescribed by the Board. 5    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.7 new)6    Sec. 25-120.7. Tax. Beginning on July 1, 2026, and for 7each 12-month period thereafter, for the privilege of holding 8a license to operate fantasy contests under this Act, this 9State shall impose a privilege tax of 15% on the fantasy 10contest operator licensee's adjusted gross fantasy contest 11receipts. 12    (230 ILCS 45/25-120.8 new)13    Sec. 25-120.8. Responsible gaming. 14    (a) Each fantasy contest operator shall include a 15statement regarding obtaining assistance with gambling 16problems, the text of which shall be determined by rule by the 17Department of Human Services, on the licensee's portal, 18Internet website, or computer or mobile application.19    (b) Any resident, or nonresident if allowed to participate 20in fantasy contests, may voluntarily prohibit themselves from 21establishing an account with a licensee under this Act. The 22Board shall incorporate the voluntary self-exclusion program 23for fantasy contests into any existing self-exclusion program 24that it operates on the effective date of this amendatory Act   SB3733- 27 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1of the 104th General Assembly. 2    Section 15. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 3changing Section 28-1 and 28-8 as follows: 4    (720 ILCS 5/28-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1)5    Sec. 28-1. Gambling. 6    (a) A person commits gambling when he or she:7        (1) knowingly plays a game of chance or skill for 8    money or other thing of value, unless excepted in 9    subsection (b) of this Section;10        (2) knowingly makes a wager upon the result of any 11    game, contest, or any political nomination, appointment or 12    election;13        (3) knowingly operates, keeps, owns, uses, purchases, 14    exhibits, rents, sells, bargains for the sale or lease of, 15    manufactures or distributes any gambling device;16        (4) contracts to have or give himself or herself or 17    another the option to buy or sell, or contracts to buy or 18    sell, at a future time, any grain or other commodity 19    whatsoever, or any stock or security of any company, where 20    it is at the time of making such contract intended by both 21    parties thereto that the contract to buy or sell, or the 22    option, whenever exercised, or the contract resulting 23    therefrom, shall be settled, not by the receipt or 24    delivery of such property, but by the payment only of   SB3733- 28 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    differences in prices thereof; however, the issuance, 2    purchase, sale, exercise, endorsement or guarantee, by or 3    through a person registered with the Secretary of State 4    pursuant to Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law of 5    1953, or by or through a person exempt from such 6    registration under said Section 8, of a put, call, or 7    other option to buy or sell securities which have been 8    registered with the Secretary of State or which are exempt 9    from such registration under Section 3 of the Illinois 10    Securities Law of 1953 is not gambling within the meaning 11    of this paragraph (4);12        (5) knowingly owns or possesses any book, instrument 13    or apparatus by means of which bets or wagers have been, or 14    are, recorded or registered, or knowingly possesses any 15    money which he has received in the course of a bet or 16    wager;17        (6) knowingly sells pools upon the result of any game 18    or contest of skill or chance, political nomination, 19    appointment or election;20        (7) knowingly sets up or promotes any lottery or 21    sells, offers to sell or transfers any ticket or share for 22    any lottery;23        (8) knowingly sets up or promotes any policy game or 24    sells, offers to sell or knowingly possesses or transfers 25    any policy ticket, slip, record, document or other similar 26    device;  SB3733- 29 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1        (9) knowingly drafts, prints or publishes any lottery 2    ticket or share, or any policy ticket, slip, record, 3    document or similar device, except for such activity 4    related to lotteries, bingo games and raffles authorized 5    by and conducted in accordance with the laws of Illinois 6    or any other state or foreign government;7        (10) knowingly advertises any lottery or policy game, 8    except for such activity related to lotteries, bingo games 9    and raffles authorized by and conducted in accordance with 10    the laws of Illinois or any other state;11        (11) knowingly transmits information as to wagers, 12    betting odds, or changes in betting odds by telephone, 13    telegraph, radio, semaphore or similar means; or knowingly 14    installs or maintains equipment for the transmission or 15    receipt of such information; except that nothing in this 16    subdivision (11) prohibits transmission or receipt of such 17    information for use in news reporting of sporting events 18    or contests; or19        (12) knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an 20    Internet site that permits a person to play a game of 21    chance or skill for money or other thing of value by means 22    of the Internet or to make a wager upon the result of any 23    game, contest, political nomination, appointment, or 24    election by means of the Internet. This item (12) does not 25    apply to activities referenced in items (6), (6.1), (8), 26    (8.1), and (15) of subsection (b) of this Section.   SB3733- 30 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    (b) Participants in any of the following activities shall 2not be convicted of gambling:3        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 4    happening of chance including without limitation contracts 5    of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or accident 6    insurance.7        (2) Offers of prizes, award or compensation to the 8    actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the 9    determination of skill, speed, strength or endurance or to 10    the owners of animals or vehicles entered in such contest.11        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by the law of 12    this State.13        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 14    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 15    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 16    commerce to any place outside this State when such 17    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal 18    law; or the manufacture, distribution, or possession of 19    video gaming terminals, as defined in the Video Gaming 20    Act, by manufacturers, distributors, and terminal 21    operators licensed to do so under the Video Gaming Act.22        (5) The game commonly known as "bingo", when conducted 23    in accordance with the Bingo License and Tax Act.24        (6) Lotteries when conducted by the State of Illinois 25    in accordance with the Illinois Lottery Law. This 26    exemption includes any activity conducted by the   SB3733- 31 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    Department of Revenue to sell lottery tickets pursuant to 2    the provisions of the Illinois Lottery Law and its rules.3        (6.1) The purchase of lottery tickets through the 4    Internet for a lottery conducted by the State of Illinois 5    under the program established in Section 7.12 of the 6    Illinois Lottery Law. 7        (7) Possession of an antique slot machine that is 8    neither used nor intended to be used in the operation or 9    promotion of any unlawful gambling activity or enterprise. 10    For the purpose of this subparagraph (b)(7), an antique 11    slot machine is one manufactured 25 years ago or earlier.12        (8) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in 13    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act.14        (8.1) The purchase of raffle chances for a raffle 15    conducted in accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs 16    Act. 17        (9) Charitable games when conducted in accordance with 18    the Charitable Games Act.19        (10) Pull tabs and jar games when conducted under the 20    Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.21        (11) Gambling games when authorized by the Illinois 22    Gambling Act.23        (12) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed 24    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 25    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 26    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when   SB3733- 32 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 2        (13) Games of skill or chance where money or other 3    things of value can be won but no payment or purchase is 4    required to participate. 5        (14) Savings promotion raffles authorized under 6    Section 5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of 7    the Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 8    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 9    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12 10    U.S.C. 1463). 11        (15) Sports wagering when conducted in accordance with 12    the Sports Wagering Act. 13        (16) Fantasy contests conducted in accordance with 14    Sections 25-120 through 25-120.8 of the Sports Wagering 15    Act. 16    (c) Sentence.17    Gambling is a Class A misdemeanor. A second or subsequent 18conviction under subsections (a)(3) through (a)(12), is a 19Class 4 felony.20    (d) Circumstantial evidence.21    In prosecutions under this Section circumstantial evidence 22shall have the same validity and weight as in any criminal 23prosecution.24(Source: P.A. 101-31, Article 25, Section 25-915, eff. 256-28-19; 101-31, Article 35, Section 35-80, eff. 6-28-19; 26101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)   SB3733- 33 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1    (720 ILCS 5/28-8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-8)2    Sec. 28-8. Gambling losses recoverable. 3    (a) Any person who by gambling shall lose to any other 4person, any sum of money or thing of value, amounting to the 5sum of $50 or more and shall pay or deliver the same or any 6part thereof, may sue for and recover the money or other thing 7of value, so lost and paid or delivered, in a civil action 8against the winner thereof, with costs, in the circuit court. 9No person who accepts from another person for transmission, 10and transmits, either in his own name or in the name of such 11other person, any order for any transaction to be made upon, or 12who executes any order given to him by another person, or who 13executes any transaction for his own account on, any regular 14board of trade or commercial, commodity or stock exchange, 15shall, under any circumstances, be deemed a "winner" of any 16moneys lost by such other person in or through any such 17transactions.18    (b) If within 6 months, such person who under the terms of 19Subsection 28-8(a) is entitled to initiate action to recover 20his losses does not in fact pursue his remedy, any person may 21initiate a civil action against the winner. The court or the 22jury, as the case may be, shall determine the amount of the 23loss. After such determination, the court shall enter a 24judgment of triple the amount so determined.25    (c) Gambling losses as a result of gambling conducted on a   SB3733- 34 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1video gaming terminal licensed under the Video Gaming Act are 2not recoverable under this Section.3    (d) Losses as a result of participation in single-player 4fantasy contests against a fantasy contest operator prior to 5the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 6Assembly are not recoverable under this Section.7    (e) Losses as a result of participation in fantasy 8contests conducted under Sections 25-120 through 25-120.8 of 9the Sports Wagering Act are not recoverable under this Section 10(Source: P.A. 98-31, eff. 6-24-13.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.  SB3733- 35 -LRB104 20098 LNS 33549 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    5 ILCS 100/5-45.71 new4    230 ILCS 45/25-105    230 ILCS 45/25-256    230 ILCS 45/25-457    230 ILCS 45/25-1008    230 ILCS 45/25-120 new9    230 ILCS 45/25-120.1 new10    230 ILCS 45/25-120.2 new11    230 ILCS 45/25-120.3 new12    230 ILCS 45/25-120.4 new13    230 ILCS 45/25-120.5 new14    230 ILCS 45/25-120.6 new15    230 ILCS 45/25-120.7 new16    230 ILCS 45/25-120.8 new17    720 ILCS 5/28-1from Ch. 38, par. 28-118    720 ILCS 5/28-8from Ch. 38, par. 28-8